Virginia statutes. Title 64.2. Wills, Trusts, and Fiduciaries.
Article 1. Definitions.

§ 64.2-100.
Definitions.

As used in this title, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Bona fide purchaser”
means a purchaser of property for value who has acted in the transaction in good faith. Notice of a seller’s marital status, or notice of the existence of a premarital or marital agreement, does not affect the status of a bona fide purchaser. A “purchaser” is one who acquires property by sale, lease, discount, negotiation, mortgage, pledge, or lien or who otherwise deals with property in a voluntary transaction, other than a gift. A purchaser gives “value” for property acquired in return for a binding commitment to extend credit to the transferor or another as security for or in total or partial satisfaction of a pre-existing claim, or in return for any other consideration sufficient to support a simple contract.

“Fiduciary”
includes a guardian, committee, trustee, executor, conservator, or personal representative.

“Personal representative”
includes the executor under a will or the administrator of the estate of a decedent, the administrator of such estate with the will annexed, the administrator of such estate unadministered by a former representative, whether there is a will or not, any person who is under the order of a circuit court to take into his possession the estate of a decedent for administration, and every other curator of a decedent’s estate, for or against whom suits may be brought for causes of action that accrued to or against the decedent.

“Trustee”
means a trustee under a probated will or an inter vivos trust instrument.

“Will”
includes any testament, codicil, exercise of a power of appointment by will or by a writing in the nature of a will, or any other testamentary disposition.

History.

Code 1950, § 64-47; 1968, c. 656, § 64.1-45; 1992, cc. 617, 647, §

64.1-01

; 2012, c. 614.

Transition provisions.

Acts 2012, c. 614, effective October 1, 2012, recodified

Titles 26

, 31, and 64.1, as well as Chapters 10 (§

37.2-1000

et seq.) and 10.1 (§

37.2-1031

et seq.) of Title 37.2 and Chapters 2.1 (§ 55-34.1 et seq.), 15 (§ 55-268.11et seq.), 15.1 (§ 55-277.1 et seq.), 16 (§ 55-278 et seq.), 22 (§ 55-401 et seq.), and 31 (§ 55-541.01 et seq.) of Title 55. In addition to revision by Acts 2012, c. 614, the recodified sections were also amended by other acts passed at the 2012 Session. As required by § 30-152, the Code Commission has incorporated the majority of these amendments into the new sections. Where appropriate, the historical citations to former sections have been added to corresponding new sections. For tables of corresponding former and new sections, see the tables in Volume 10.

Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 2, provides: “That whenever any of the conditions, requirements, provisions, or contents of any section or chapter of

Titles 26

, 31, 37.2, 55, and 64.1 or any other title of the Code of Virginia as such titles existed prior to October 1, 2012, are transferred in the same or modified form to a new section or chapter of Title 64.2 or any other title of the Code of Virginia and whenever any such former section or chapter is given a new number in Title 64.2 or any other title, all references to any such former section or chapter of

Titles 26

, 31, 37.2, 55, and 64.1 or other title appearing in this Code shall be construed to apply to the new or renumbered section or chapter containing such conditions, requirements, provisions, contents, or portions thereof.”

Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 3, provides: “That the regulations of any department or agency affected by the revision of

Titles 26

, 31, 37.2, 55, and 64.1 or such other titles in effect on the effective date of this act shall continue in effect to the extent that they are not in conflict with this act and shall be deemed to be regulations adopted under this act.”

Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 4, provides: “That the provisions of § 30-152 of the Code of Virginia shall apply to the revision of Title 64.2 so as to give effect to other laws enacted by the 2012 Session of the General Assembly, notwithstanding the delay in the effective date of this act.”

Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 5, provides: “That the repeal of

Titles 26

and 31; Chapters 10 and 10.1 of Title 37.2; Chapter 2.1, Article 1.2 of Chapter 15, and Chapters 15.1, 16, 22, and 31 of Title 55; and Title 64.1, effective as of October 1, 2012, shall not affect any act or offense done or committed, or any penalty incurred, or any right established, accrued, or accruing on or before such date, or any proceeding, prosecution, suit, or action pending on that day. Except as otherwise provided in this act, neither the repeal of

Titles 26

and 31; Chapters 10 and 10.1 of Title 37.2; Chapter 2.1, Article 1.2 of Chapter 15, and Chapters 15.1, 16, 22, and 31 of Title 55; and Title 64.1 nor the enactment of Title 64.2 shall apply to offenses committed prior to October 1, 2012, and prosecution for such offenses shall be governed by the prior law, which is continued in effect for that purpose. For the purpose of this enactment, an offense was committed prior to October 1, 2012, if any of the essential elements of the offense occurred prior thereto.”

Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 6, provides: “That any notice given, recognizance taken, or process or writ issued before October 1, 2012, shall be valid although given, taken, or to be returned to a day after such date, in like manner as if Title 64.2 had been effective before the same was given, taken, or issued.”

Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 7, provides: “That if any clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section of Title 64.2 shall be adjudged in any court of competent jurisdiction to be invalid, the judgment shall not affect, impair, or invalidate the remainder thereof, but shall be confined in its operation to the clause, sentence, paragraph, subdivision, or section thereof directly involved in the controversy in which the judgment shall have been rendered, and to this end the provisions of Title 64.2 are declared severable.”

Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 8, provides: “That the provisions of former § 64.1-55, which provide that holographic wills admitted to probate in the Commonwealth prior to March 20, 1922, where the handwriting was proved by one disinterested witness instead of two disinterested witnesses are validated and are as binding and effectual as if proved by two witnesses shall continue to apply, and shall apply only, to such holographic wills.”

Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 9, provides: “That the provisions of former § 26-57, which provide that the actions of substitute trustees who have been appointed without sufficient notice or any notice to any interested party done prior to July 27, 1942, are validated and effectual as if notice was given shall continue to apply, and shall apply only, to the actions of such substitute trustees.”

Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 10, provides: “That the repeal of

Titles 26

and 31; Chapters 10 and 10.1 of Title 37.2; Chapter 2.1, Article 1.2 of Chapter 15, and Chapters 15.1, 16, 22, and 31 of Title 55; and Title 64.1, effective as of October 1, 2012, shall not affect the validity, enforceability, or legality of any will, trust instrument, power of attorney, or other instrument or of any fiduciary relationship, or any right established or accrued under such instrument or by such relationship, that existed prior to such repeal.”

Acts 2012, c. 614, cl. 12, provides: “That the provisions of this act shall become effective on October 1, 2012.”

Law Review.

For survey of Virginia law on wills, trusts, and estates for year 1979-80, see 67 Va. L. Rev. 369 (1981).

For 1992 survey of property law in Virginia, see 26 U. Rich. L. Rev. 825 (1992).

For 2003/2004 survey of the law of wills, trusts and estates, see 39 U. Rich. L. Rev. 447 (2004).

For annual survey of Virginia law article, “Wills, Trusts, and Estates,” see 47 U. Rich. L. Rev. 343 (2012).

Research References.

Harrison on Wills and Administration for Virginia and West Virginia (Matthew Bender). Chapter 1 Introductory.
§ 1.02 And Is the Creature of Law, et seq. Cox.

Virginia Forms (Matthew Bender). No. 15-101 Checklist for Will Interview, et seq.

§ 64.2-101.
Construction of generic terms.

In the interpretation of wills and trusts, adopted persons and persons born out of wedlock are included in class gift terminology or terms of relationship in accordance with rules for determining relationships for purposes of intestate succession unless a contrary intent appears on the face of the will or trust. In determining the intent of a testator or settlor, adopted persons are presumptively included in such terms as “children,” “issue,” “kindred,” “heirs,” “relatives,” “descendents” or similar words of classification and are presumptively excluded by such terms as “natural children,” “issue of the body,” “blood kindred,” “heirs of the body,” “blood relatives,” “descendents of the body” or similar words of classification. In the event that a fiduciary makes payment to members of a class to the exclusion of persons born out of wedlock of whose claim of paternity or maternity the fiduciary has no knowledge, the fiduciary shall not be held liable to such persons for payments made prior to knowledge of such claim. This section shall apply to all inter vivos trusts executed after July 1, 1978, and to all wills of decedents dying after July 1, 1978, regardless of when executed.

History.

1978, c. 647, § 64.1-71.1; 1987, c. 604; 2012, c. 614.

Law Review.

For 1987 survey of Virginia wills, trusts, and estates law, see 21 U. Rich. L. Rev. 855 (1987).

For an article relating to developments in the law of wills, trusts and estates in 1998, see 32 U. Rich. L. Rev. 1405 (1998).

For annual survey article on wills, trusts, and estates, see 40 U. Rich. L. Rev. 381 (2005).